Maryland, session 2025, HB0831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–232.
(b) The Department of Human Resources of Carroll County may request from the
Central Repository a State and national criminal history records check for a prospective
employee or volunteer of Carroll County [who will be assigned to a position that involves:
(1) inspections;
(2) approval or denial of a permit, a license, or any other grant of authority;
(3) work in the offices of the County Commissioners, sheriff, State’s
Attorney, circuit court, or county attorney;
(4) collecting or handling money; or
(5) care or supervision of a minor].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
– 1 –

Ch. 154 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –